Utah statutes.
59-1-502.5.   Initial hearing.
(1)  At least 30 days before any formal hearing is held in response to a
party's request for agency action, an initial hearing shall be held before one
or more tax commissioners or an administrative law judge designated by the
commission at which proffers of evidence, including testimony, documents, and
other exhibits may be made and oral or written argument on legal issues may be
received.
(2)  Any party participating in an initial hearing shall have the right to
informal discovery under any rules established by the commission.
(3)  Parties may appear at the initial hearing in person or through agents,
employees, or other representatives, but any person appearing on behalf of
another party or entity shall have full settlement authority on behalf of the
party the person is representing.
(4)  A record may not be kept of the initial hearing and all  initial hearing
proceedings are privileged and do not constitute admissions against interest
of any party participating in the  hearing.
(5)  At the  initial hearing, or as soon thereafter as reasonably practicable,
the commission may take any action it deems appropriate to settle, compromise,
or reduce the deficiency, or adjust the assessed valuation of any property.
(6)  Nothing in this section may limit a party's right to a formal hearing
under Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.
